Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 19 Auctioneers
62-19-111. General licensing provisions.

An individual applying for a license as a bid caller auctioneer must submit an application to the commission on the prescribed form. The application must be accompanied by satisfactory proof that the applicant:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; and

Has successfully completed sixteen (16) hours of classroom or online instruction on the basic fundamentals of auctioneering at an auction school accredited by the commission; and

Auction chant instruction is optional and is not to be included in the basic fundamentals of auctioneering, nor may auction chant instruction be completed online.

An individual applying for a license as an affiliate auctioneer must submit an application to the commission on the prescribed form. The application must be accompanied by a nonrefundable examination fee as set by the commission and must prove that the applicant:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; and

Has successfully completed, in addition to the education requirements under subdivision (a)(1)(B), thirty-four (34) hours of classroom or online instruction in the fundamentals of auctioneering at an auction school accredited by the commission.

An individual applying for a license as a principal auctioneer must submit an application to the commission on the prescribed form. The application must be accompanied by a nonrefundable examination fee as set by the commission and must prove that the applicant:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Has served as an affiliate auctioneer under the supervision of a licensed, full-time principal or public automobile auctioneer for a period of six (6) months; and

Has obtained a high school diploma, general equivalency diploma (GED), or HiSET(r) diploma.

The commission may require other proof as necessary, through the application or otherwise, to assess the honesty, trustworthiness, integrity, reputation, and competency of the auctioneer applicant.

An individual who meets the requirements of subsections (b)-(d) may take an examination prescribed by the commission to determine the individual's qualifications. The examination must include, but not be limited to, reading, writing, spelling, elementary arithmetic, elementary principles of land economics, ethics, the law of this state relating to bulk sales, auctions and brokerage, and the provisions of this chapter. The examination for a principal auctioneer's license must be more specific in nature and scope than the examination for an affiliate auctioneer's license.

An applicant who fails an examination shall pay a fee as set by the commission for each reexamination.

The commission shall issue a license and pocket card, upon receipt of the appropriate fee as set by the commission, to an applicant who meets the requirements for licensure under this chapter. The license must be conspicuously displayed at all times in the office of the licensee.

Except as provided in § 62-19-117, every auctioneer licensed under this chapter shall maintain a place of business in this state. A bid caller licensee may list their home address as their place of business with the commission.

All licenses issued by the commission expire two (2) years from the original date the license was issued. Each license must be renewed on or before its expiration date.

If a licensee fails to renew a license on or before its expiration date, the commission may, in its discretion, renew the license upon application within two (2) months of the expiration date. The application must be accompanied by the prescribed fee and payment of a monetary penalty as set by the commission. A person seeking to renew a license later than two (2) months after its expiration must reapply for licensure. The commission may, in its discretion:

Waive reexamination or additional education requirements for the applicant; or

Reinstate a license subject to the applicant's compliance with reasonable conditions that the commission may prescribe, including payment of an additional reasonable fee to be set by the commission.

When fees are remitted by mail to the commission, the date of payment is determined by the official postmark of the mail.

When an affiliate auctioneer's employment with an auctioneer is terminated for any reason, the auctioneer shall immediately deliver, or send by registered mail, the affiliate auctioneer's license to the commission. The affiliate auctioneer shall not engage in the business of an auctioneer until the affiliate auctioneer receives a new license and pocket card for the unexpired term bearing the name and address of the new employer. The fee for the new license and pocket card is set by the commission.

No more than one (1) license may be issued to an affiliate auctioneer to be in effect at any one (1) time.

No license issued by the commission may authorize the licensee to engage in business at a location other than what is stated on the license. A licensee shall immediately notify the commission in writing in the event of a change of business location. The written notice must be accompanied by the current license and pocket card and a fee as set by the commission.

Auctions for the sale of registered livestock must be conducted by a licensed auctioneer. The auctioneer is exempt from issuing closing statements and disbursing funds if such responsibilities are performed by a duly chartered livestock association or livestock breed association.

An affiliate auctioneer may be employed by a licensed auctioneer who is not designated as the affiliate's sponsor upon receiving written permission from the affiliate's sponsor and notifying the commission of the employment in the proper form and manner as prescribed by rules promulgated by the commission. An auctioneer employing an affiliate who is not under the auctioneer's sponsorship is responsible for the actions of the affiliate while under that auctioneer's employment. The sponsor is responsible for the actions of the affiliate at all other times.

The commission may deny an applicant for an affiliate auctioneer or auctioneer the right to take an examination for a period of up to two (2) years if the applicant is found by the commission to have conducted business within this state as an affiliate auctioneer or auctioneer without being licensed.

An individual applying for a license as a public automobile auctioneer must submit an application to the commission on the prescribed form. The application must be accompanied by a nonrefundable examination fee as set by the commission and satisfactory proof that the applicant:

Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Has served as a principal auctioneer for a period of two (2) years; and

Has successfully completed, in addition to the education required by subdivision (b)(2), fifteen (15) hours of more rigorous classroom or online instruction in automobile auctioneering as approved by the commission.

An individual who receives a public automobile auctioneer license may exercise all activities authorized under a principal auctioneer license or bid caller license without having to meet additional licensure requirements.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 12; 1971, ch. 161, § 2; 1971, ch. 218, § 1; 1976, ch. 824, § 5; 1978, ch. 569, §§ 4, 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; Acts 1981, ch. 416, §§ 6, 7; T.C.A., § 62-1912; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 8; 1986, ch. 915, § 3; 1989, ch. 360, § 10; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 158-165; 1990, ch. 1026, § 42; 1991, ch. 485, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 91, §§ 1, 2, 5; 1999, ch. 358, §§ 4-6; 2008, ch. 724, § 3; 2019, ch. 471, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 13 provided for authorization of the commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of that act and that all such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 14 provided that the provisions of that act do not apply to any court sale.

Acts 2008, ch. 724, § 8 provided that the Tennessee auctioneer commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which added subsection (s). All the rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2019 rewrote the section which read: “(a) Any individual who desires a license as an apprentice auctioneer shall submit an application to the commission on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable examination fee as set by the commission and satisfactory proof that the applicant has:“(1) Reached at least eighteen (18) years of age; and“(2) Successfully completed eighty (80) hours of classroom instruction in the fundamentals of auctioneering at an auction school accredited by the commission.“(b) Any individual who desires a license as an auctioneer shall submit an application to the commission on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable examination fee as set by the commission and satisfactory proof that the applicant has:“(1) Reached at least eighteen (18) years of age;“(2) Served as an apprentice auctioneer under the supervision of a licensed, full-time auctioneer for a period of two (2) years;“(3) Successfully completed, in addition to the education required by subdivision (a)(2), thirty (30) hours of more rigorous classroom instruction in an auctioneering-related subject approved by the commission; and“(4) Obtained a high school diploma or general equivalency diploma (GED(R)).“(c) The commission may require other proof, through the application or otherwise, that it deems desirable as to the honesty, trustworthiness, integrity, reputation and competency of the auctioneer or apprentice auctioneer applicant.“(d) Any person who meets the requirements of subsections (a)-(c) is entitled to an examination prescribed by the commission to determine the person's qualifications. The examination shall include, but not be limited to, reading, writing, spelling, elementary arithmetic, elementary principles of land economics, ethics, the law of this state relating to bulk sales, auctions and brokerage and the provisions of this chapter. The examination for an auctioneer's license shall be of more exacting nature and scope than the examination for an apprentice auctioneer's license.“(e) Any applicant who fails an examination must pay a fee as set by the commission for each reexamination.“(f) The commission shall issue to a qualified applicant a license and pocket card upon receipt of the appropriate fee as set by the commission. The license shall be conspicuously displayed at all times in the office of the licensee.“(g) Except as provided in § 62-19-117(a), every auctioneer licensed under this chapter shall maintain a place of business in this state at a firm that has been duly licensed by the commission.“(h)(1) A person who desires a license for a firm shall submit an application to the commission on the prescribed form. A firm license must be issued in the name of the firm with a specific person acting as principal and holder of a valid auctioneer's license. The application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable examination fee as set by the commission and satisfactory proof that:“(A) The applicant has reached at least eighteen (18) years of age;“(B) The applicant, if not a holder of a principal auctioneer's license, has completed thirty (30) hours of rigorous classroom instruction in an auctioneering-related subject approved by the commission; and“(C) The applicant has obtained a high school diploma or general equivalency diploma (GED(R)).“(2) The commission may require other proof, through the application or otherwise, that it deems desirable as to the honesty, trustworthiness, integrity, reputation and competency of the auctioneer or apprentice auctioneer applicant.“(3) Any person who meets the requirements of subdivisions (h)(1) and (2) shall be entitled to an examination prescribed by the commission to determine the person's qualifications. The examination shall include, but shall not be limited to, reading, writing, spelling, elementary arithmetic, elementary principles of land economics, ethics, the law of this state relating to bulk sales, auctions and brokerage and the provisions of this chapter.“(4) The examination for a firm license shall be of a more exacting nature and scope than the examination for an apprentice auctioneer's license, except that a nonauctioneer applying for a firm license shall not be required to take the oral part of the auctioneer's test consisting of actual bid calling.“(5) Any applicant who fails an examination must pay a fee as set by the commission for each reexamination.“(6) The commission shall issue to qualified applicants a license and pocket card upon receipt of the appropriate fee as set by the commission. The firm license shall be conspicuously displayed at all times in the office of the licensee.“(7) Any person currently holding a valid auctioneer firm license may renew the license by filing an application for renewal and paying the required fee before the expiration date of the firm license.“(8) If the applicant for a firm license maintains more than one (1) place of business within the state, the applicant shall apply for and obtain an additional firm license for each branch office.“(9) A firm license shall automatically be suspended if no licensed auctioneer is engaged in business in the firm. The license may be reinstated by the commission for the unexpired term upon proof that a duly licensed auctioneer has been affiliated with the firm.“(10) Any person in this state who for a fee is in the business of managing auctions to the extent the person is responsible for the advertising, consignments, promotion or distribution of funds must hold a valid firm license.“(11) All contracts for services to be performed by an auction firm, except an auto auction as defined in § 55-17-102, must be negotiated for and signed by an auctioneer who is a member of the firm or by the auctioneer's attorney.“(i) All licenses issued by the commission shall expire two (2) years from the original date the license was issued. Each license must be renewed on or before its expiration date.“(j) If a licensee fails to renew a license on or before its expiration date, the commission may, in its discretion, renew the license upon application within two (2) months thereafter. The application shall be accompanied by the prescribed fee plus a penalty as set by the commission. Any person wishing to renew a license later than two (2) months after its expiration shall reapply for licensure; provided, that the commission may, in its discretion:“(1) Waive reexamination or additional education requirements for such an applicant; or“(2) Reinstate a license subject to the applicant's compliance with reasonable conditions that the commission may prescribe, including payment of an additional reasonable fee to be set by the commission.“(k) When fees are remitted by mail to the commission, the date of payment shall be determined by the official postmark of the mail.“(l) When an apprentice auctioneer's employment with an auctioneer is terminated for any reason, the auctioneer shall immediately deliver or send by registered mail the apprentice auctioneer's license to the commission. The apprentice auctioneer shall not engage in any activity defined in § 62-19-101(3) until the apprentice auctioneer receives a new license and pocket card for the unexpired term, bearing the name and address of the new employer. The fee for the new license and pocket card shall be set by the commission.“(m) No more than one (1) license shall be issued to any apprentice auctioneer to be in effect at any one time.“(n) No license issued by the commission shall authorize the licensee to engage in business at any location other than that set forth on the license. A licensee shall immediately notify the commission in writing in the event of a change of business location. The written notice shall be accompanied by the current license and pocket card and a fee as set by the commission.“(o) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(2), any individual who otherwise would qualify for the auctioneer's examination by January 1, 1984, need complete only one (1) year of apprenticeship in order to be eligible for the examination.“(p) Auctions for the sale of registered livestock must be conducted by a licensed auctioneer. The auctioneer shall be exempt from the responsibilities of issuing closing statements and disbursing funds if the responsibilities are performed by a duly chartered livestock association or livestock breed association.“(q) An apprentice auctioneer may be employed by a licensed auctioneer who is not designated as the apprentice's sponsor upon receiving written permission from the apprentice's sponsor and notifying the commission of the employment in the proper form and manner as prescribed by the rules of the commission. An auctioneer employing an apprentice who is not under that auctioneer's sponsorship shall be responsible for the actions of the apprentice while under that auctioneer's employment, and the sponsor shall be responsible for the actions of the apprentice at all other times.“(r) The commission may deny any applicant for an apprentice, auctioneer or firm license the right to take an examination for a period up to two (2) years if the applicant is found by the commission to have conducted business within this state as an apprentice auctioneer, auctioneer or firm owner without first having been properly licensed.“(s) Any individual who desires a license as public automobile auctioneer shall submit an application to the commission on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable examination fee as set by the commission and satisfactory proof that the applicant has:“(1) Reached at least twenty-one (21) years of age;“(2) Served as an auctioneer for a period of two (2) years; and“(3) Successfully completed, in addition to the education required by subdivision (a)(2), thirty (30) hours of more rigorous classroom instruction in automobile auctioneering approved by the commission.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules concerning certain license renewal dates, § 56-1-302.

62-19-112. Denial, revocation or suspension of license by commission — Retirement of license.

The commission may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, hold a hearing as provided in this chapter and investigate the actions of any auctioneer, affiliate auctioneer or any person who assumes to act in either capacity; provided, that the complaint with the evidence, documentary or otherwise, presented in connection with the complaint, makes out a prima facie case.

The commission may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew any license issued under this chapter where the license has been obtained by false or fraudulent representations or for any of the following causes:

Making any substantial misrepresentation including, but not limited to, individuals licensed solely as bid caller auctioneers who hold themselves out to others as principal auctioneers or public automobile auctioneers;

Pursuing a continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making false promises through agents or advertising or otherwise;

Accepting valuable consideration as an affiliate auctioneer for the performance of any of the acts specified in this chapter, from any person, except the licensee's employer auctioneer;

Failing to account for or remit, within a reasonable time, any money belonging to others that comes into the licensee's possession, commingling funds of others with the licensee's own or failing to keep the funds of others in an escrow or trustee account; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to require an auto auction as defined in § 55-17-102(1)(A) to maintain or use an escrow account when the auction does not accept and deposit funds of others;

Paying valuable consideration to any person for services performed in violation of this chapter;

Being convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction of this or any other state, or of the United States, of a criminal offense involving moral turpitude or a felony. However, an action taken under this subdivision (b)(6) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title;

Violating any provision of this chapter, or any rule or regulation duly promulgated under this chapter;

Failing to furnish voluntarily to all interested parties, at the time of execution, copies of all written instruments prepared by the auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer;

Failing prior to the sale at public auction to enter into a written contract with the owner or consignee of any property to be sold, containing the terms and conditions upon which the licensee receives the property for sale;

Engaging in the business of auctioning real property without being duly licensed as a broker or affiliate broker under the Tennessee Real Estate Broker License Act of 1973, compiled in chapter 13 of this title;

Knowingly using false bidders, cappers or pullers;

Any conduct of any auctioneer that demonstrates improper, fraudulent, incompetent or dishonest dealings;

Violating title 55, chapter 17, or any rule duly promulgated under title 55, chapter 17, pertaining to the sale or auction of motor vehicles; or

Negotiating or executing an auction contract to sell goods, take possession of seller assets, or take possession of auction proceeds as a bid caller auctioneer licensee.

The affirmative vote of a majority of the commission shall be necessary to revoke or suspend a license.

An auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer may retire the auctioneer's or affiliate auctioneer's license by making such request in writing and paying the appropriate fees set by the commission. The written request must be accompanied by the license certificate and pocket card. The retiree shall be responsible for notifying the commission of any change in address. Only licenses that are current and in good standing with the commission may be retired.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, §§ 13, 14; 1976, ch. 824, § 6; 1980, ch. 451, §§ 6, 7; 1980, ch. 716, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 62-1913, 62-1914; Acts 1983, ch. 250, §§ 9-11; 1986, ch. 915, §§ 4, 5; 1989, ch. 171, § 1; 1991, ch. 359, § 1; 1999, ch. 358, § 7; 2003, ch. 159, § 2; 2018, ch. 745, § 12; 2019, ch. 471, §§ 11-13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 13 provided for authorization of the commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the amendment to (d) by the act and that all such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 14 provided that the amendment to (d) by the act will not apply to any court sale.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “affiliate auctioneer” for “apprentice auctioneer” and “affiliate auctioneer’s” for “apprentice auctioneer’s” throughout; added “including, but not limited to, individuals licensed solely as bid caller auctioneers who hold themselves out to others as principal auctioneers or public automobile auctioneers” at the end of (b)(1); and added (b)(14).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Judicial revocation of license, § 62-19-114.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

Attorney General Opinions. Consequences of advertising an “absolute auction”, OAG 05-182, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 184 (12/22/05).

62-19-113. Immunity of commissioners.

The commission is declared to be a quasi-judicial body and the members or the employees of the commission are granted immunity from civil liability when acting in good faith and in the performance of their duties as described in this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 14; 1980, ch. 451, § 7; T.C.A., § 62-1914.

62-19-114. Judicial revocation of license.

Whenever any person claiming to have been injured or damaged by the gross negligence, incompetency, fraud, dishonesty or misconduct on the part of any licensee following the calling or engaging in the business described in this chapter files suit upon the claim against the licensee in any court of record in this state and recovers judgment on the claim, the court may as part of its judgment or decree in the case, if it deems it a proper case in which so to do, revoke the defendant's license, which shall not be reissued to the licensee except upon unanimous vote of all members of the commission in favor of reissuance and only then after the lapse of a period of ninety (90) days from the date of revocation.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 15; T.C.A., § 62-1915; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 12.

62-19-115. Rights and duties of licensee — Sponsorship of affiliate auctioneer.

Any auctioneer licensed under this chapter may conduct auctions at any time or place in this state. The licensee shall, upon request, furnish to the chief of police or sheriff of the city or county where the auction is to be held a list of properties to be sold twenty-four (24) hours prior to the auction.

A principal auctioneer may sponsor an affiliate auctioneer after one (1) year of licensure. There is no limit as to how many affiliate auctioneers a principal auctioneer or public automobile auctioneer may sponsor.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 16; T.C.A., § 62-1916; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 13; 1987, ch. 62, § 1; 2019, ch. 471, § 14.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Requirements of bond, § 62-19-116.

62-19-116. Auctioneer education and recovery account.

There is established within the general fund an auctioneer education and recovery account, referred to as the “account” in this section. All funds received by the commission under this section shall be deposited into the account and held solely for the purposes of this section. The commission shall maintain a minimum balance of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in the account.

Moneys within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer in accordance with § 9-4-603 for the sole benefit of the account.

No new auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer license shall be issued unless the applicant pays, in addition to the license fee, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) or a lesser amount that the commission may by rule establish for deposit into the account.

No renewal auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer license shall be issued unless the applicant pays, in addition to the renewal fee, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) or a lesser amount that the commission may by rule establish for the purpose of ensuring that the required minimum balance is maintained in the account.

Any person may, by order of any court of competent jurisdiction, recover from the account actual or compensatory damages, not including interest and costs, resulting from any violation of this chapter or of any rule promulgated under this chapter, committed by a licensee on or after June 30, 1987; provided, that:

The liability of the account shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per transaction, regardless of the number of persons aggrieved;

The liability of the account for the acts of a licensee, when acting as such, shall be terminated upon the issuance of court orders authorizing payments from the account for judgments, or any unsatisfied portion of judgments, in an aggregate amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) on behalf of the licensee;

A licensee acting as such shall have no claim against the account; and

A bonding company not involved in an auction shall have no claim against the account.

When any aggrieved person commences an action for a judgment that may result in collection from the account, the person shall promptly notify the commission to this effect in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested. The commission may, subject to the approval of the attorney general and reporter, take any action it may deem appropriate to protect the integrity of the account.

When any aggrieved person obtains a valid judgment respecting which recourse against the account is permitted under this section and all or any part of the judgment is unpaid sixty (60) days after the date of the judgment, the person may, upon termination of all proceedings, including reviews and appeals in connection with the judgment, apply to the court in which the judgment was entered for an order directing payment from the account of the amount unpaid upon the judgment. Upon determination of the court that the judgment or any part of the judgment is unpaid, the court shall enter an order directing the commission to make payment from the account to satisfy the judgment.

If the commission, pursuant to a court order, pays any amount from the account on behalf of a licensed auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer, the commission may, in its discretion, suspend or revoke the license of the auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer. No auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer whose license is revoked under this subsection (g) shall be eligible to apply for a new license until the person has repaid in full the amount paid from the account on the person's behalf, plus interest at the effective earnings rate for the account for the period the claim is unpaid.

When, upon the order of the court, the commission has paid from the account any sum to the judgment creditor, the commission shall be subrogated to all of the rights of the judgment creditor in the judgment. Any amount recovered by the commission on the judgment shall be deposited to the account. If the total amount collected on the judgment by the commission exceeds the amount paid from the account to the original judgment creditor, plus interest and the cost of collection, the commission may elect to pay the overage or reassign the remaining interest in the judgment to the original judgment creditor. The payment or reassignment to the original judgment creditor shall not subject the account to further liability for payment to the original judgment creditor based on that transaction or judgment. Any costs incurred by the commission in attempting to collect judgments shall be paid from the account.

If, at any time, the money deposited in the account is insufficient to satisfy any duly authorized claim or portion of the claim, the commission shall, when sufficient money has been deposited in the account, satisfy the unpaid claims or portions of the claim in the order that they were originally filed, plus interest at the effective earnings rate for the account for the period the claim is unpaid.

The failure of an aggrieved person to comply with this section constitutes a waiver of any rights under this section.

It is unlawful for any person to file or cause to be filed with the commission any notice, statement or other document required under this section that is false or contains any material misstatement of fact.

The commission may, in its discretion, utilize any return on investment of funds in the account and any balance in the account over one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to:

Sponsor, conduct or assist in conducting, education, training or research designed to improve the competence, effectiveness or professionalism of licensees, the members of the commission or its staff;

Prepare and disseminate information for the benefit of licensees and the general public; and

Employ an investigator to assist the commission. The investigator shall carry an identification badge issued by the department of commerce and insurance and has the authority to make investigations concerning the enforcement of the laws, rules and policies promulgated under this chapter. The investigator shall have the authority to stop any auction activity that is being promoted, managed or supervised by unlicensed individuals in violation of this chapter.

The commission shall not expend or commit sums pursuant to subdivision (l )(1) in an amount that would reduce the account to a balance of less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

No state funds shall be expended to effectuate this section other than the fees and charges set forth in this section.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 17; 1976, ch. 824, § 7; 1978, ch. 569, §§ 6, 7; T.C.A., § 62-1917; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 14; 1987, ch. 62, § 2; 1997, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 358, § 8; 2019, ch. 471, §§ 15, 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 13 provided for authorization of the commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the amendment to (l )(1)(C) by the act and that all such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 14 provided that the amendment to (l )(1)(C) by the act will not apply to any court sale.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “or affiliate auctioneer license” for “apprentice auctioneer or firm license” in (c)(1) and (c)(2); and substituted “affiliate auctioneer” for “apprentice auctioneer” twice in (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

62-19-117. Reciprocity — Service of process on nonresidents.

A nonresident of this state may become an auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer in this state by conforming to this chapter, except that a nonresident auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer regularly engaged in the auction business as a vocation and maintaining a definite place of business in some other state is not required to maintain a place of business in this state.

The commission may recognize a license issued by any other state to a nonresident auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer if the nonresident auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer is domiciled in the other state that issued the license, the other state reciprocates with this state in like manner and the licensure requirements of the other state include the passing of an examination of equal or higher standards than those required by this state.

The nonresident shall, however, be required to secure a license from the commission, which shall be issued upon application for the license, accompanied by the license fee required by this chapter and the filing of a certified copy of the applicant's license issued by the other state.

Every nonresident auctioneer shall maintain an escrow account for all funds belonging to others that come into the nonresident auctioneer's possession as a result of an auction sale in this state.

Every nonresident applicant shall file an irrevocable consent that suits and actions may be commenced against the applicant in the proper court in the county in this state in which a cause of action may arise, in which the plaintiff may reside, by service of any process or pleadings authorized by laws of this state on the commission, or a deputy to be designated by it, the consent stipulating and agreeing that the service of process or pleading shall be begun and held in all courts to be as valid and binding as if due service had been made upon the applicant in this state. The consent shall be duly acknowledged and, if made by a corporation, shall be authenticated by the seal of the corporation.

In case of any process or pleadings mentioned in this chapter being served upon the commission or upon a deputy to be designated by it, duplicate copies shall be made, one (1) of which shall be filed in the office of the administrative director of the commission and the other immediately forwarded by registered mail to the main office of the applicant against which the process or pleadings are directed.

No default in the proceedings or action shall be taken unless it is made to appear by affidavit of a member of the commission or a deputy designated by it that a copy of the process or pleadings was mailed to defendant as required by this subsection (e).

No judgment by default shall be taken in any such action or proceedings within twenty (20) days after the date of the mailing of the process or pleadings to the nonresident defendant.

The Tennessee auctioneer commission has the authority to impose any fee or licensing requirements on applicants for licenses from a reciprocal state that the reciprocal state imposes on Tennessee licensees by rule, regulation, policy or law.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 18; 1976, ch. 824, § 8; T.C.A., § 62-1918; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 15; 1987, ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 1026, § 4; 1995, ch. 61, § 1; 1997, ch. 91, § 6; 1999, ch. 358, § 1; 2019, ch. 471, §§ 17, 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 13 provided for the authorization of the commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the amendment to (e)(1) by the act and that all such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 14 provided that the amendment to (e)(1) by the act will not apply to any court sale.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “affiliate auctioneer” for “apprentice auctioneer” throughout (a) and (b)(1); and deleted “shall obtain a firm license as provided in § 62-19-111 and” preceding “shall maintain an escrow account” in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

62-19-118. Business location — Sign.

Every person licensed under this chapter shall maintain a definite place of business in this state, except as provided in § 62-19-117 as to nonresidents, and shall erect and maintain a sign in a conspicuous place on the premises at or near the outside entrance to the principal office and all branch offices.

The sign shall be written in clear and legible letters of no less than two inches (2") in height and shall clearly show the person's name and indicate that the person is an auctioneer or show the firm name and indicate that the firm is in the auction business.

The sign shall be placed so that it can easily be observed and read by anyone entering the place of business; however, licensees maintaining a place of business in multistory office buildings shall be deemed to comply with this section if their names and professions are displayed on the directories of the building in the usual fashion and manner of other tenants located in the building.

The commission may waive the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) in the event of a conflict with local ordinances or other unusual circumstances.

The commission has the authority to promulgate rules with regard to advertising auctions in this state.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 19; 1976, ch. 824, § 9; T.C.A., § 62-1919; Acts 1983, ch. 250, §§ 16, 17; 1999, ch. 358, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 13 provided for authorization of the commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the amendment to (c)(2) by the act and that all such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 14 provided that the amendment to (c)(2) by the act will not apply to any court sale.